Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB599.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 305(b), 1302.1(a.3)(4) and (6), 1306(a) introductory paragraph and 1306-D(a) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 305. Expenses of County Boards and of Primaries and Elections to Be Paid by County; Expenses of Special Elections; 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 Boards to Be Provided with Offices.--* * *(b) The county commissioners or other appropriating authorities of the county shall provide the county board with a suitable and adequate [offices] primary office at the county seat, properly furnished for keeping its records, holding its public sessions and otherwise performing its public duties, and shall also provide such branch offices for the board in cities other than the county seat, as may be necessary.* * *Section 1302.1. Date of Application for Absentee Ballot.--* * *(a.3) * * *(4) If the elector is unable to appear at the office of the county board of elections to receive the ballot, the board shall give the elector's absentee ballot to an authorized representative of the elector who is designated in writing by the elector. The authorized representative shall deliver the absentee ballot to the elector and return the completed absentee ballot, sealed in the official absentee ballot envelopes, to an employe at the primary office of the county board of elections located in the county seat under section 305(b), which shall retain the ballot, unopened, until the canvassing of all absentee ballots.* * *(6) If the elector is unable to appear at the office of the county board of elections or unable to obtain assistance from an authorized representative, the county board may provide an authorized representative or ask the judge of the court of common pleas in the county in which the elector is qualified to 20250SB0599PN0605 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 vote to direct a deputy sheriff of the county to deliver the absentee ballot to the elector if the elector is at a physical location within the county and return the completed absentee ballot, sealed in the official absentee ballot envelopes, to an employe at the primary office of the county board of elections located in the county seat under section 305(b). If there is no authorized representative and a deputy sheriff is unavailable to deliver an absentee ballot under this section, the judge may direct a constable to make such delivery in accordance with the provisions of this section.* * *Section 1306. Voting by Absentee Electors.--(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), at any time after receiving an official absentee ballot, but on or before eight o'clock P.M. the day of the primary or election, the elector shall, in secret, proceed to mark the ballot only in black lead pencil, indelible pencil or blue, black or blue-black ink, in fountain pen or ball point pen, and then fold the ballot, enclose and securely seal the same in the envelope on which is printed, stamped or endorsed "Official Election Ballot." This envelope shall then be placed in the second one, on which is printed the form of declaration of the elector, and the address of the elector's county board of election and the local election district of the elector. The elector shall then fill out, date and sign the declaration printed on such envelope. Such envelope shall then be securely sealed and the elector shall send same by mail, postage prepaid, except where franked, or deliver it in person to an employe of said county board of election at the primary office located in the county seat under section 305(b).* * *20250SB0599PN0605 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1306-D. Voting by mail-in electors.(a) General rule.--At any time after receiving an official mail-in ballot, but on or before eight o'clock P.M. the day of the primary or election, the mail-in elector shall, in secret, proceed to mark the ballot only in black lead pencil, indelible pencil or blue, black or blue-black ink, in fountain pen or ball point pen, and then fold the ballot, enclose and securely seal the same in the envelope on which is printed, stamped or endorsed "Official Election Ballot." This envelope shall then be placed in the second one, on which is printed the form of declaration of the elector, and the address of the elector's county board of election and the local election district of the elector. The elector shall then fill out, date and sign the declaration printed on such envelope. Such envelope shall then be securely sealed and the elector shall send same by mail, postage prepaid, except where franked, or deliver it in person to an employee of said county board of election at the primary office located in the county seat under section 305(b).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0599PN0605 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920